Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-380
Conversion; plan of conversion; requirements.

In any plan of conversion from a capital stock form of organization to a mutual form:

(1) Each savings account holder shall receive without payment a withdrawable account of the same general class in the converted institution equal in amount and equal in time tenure to his or her withdrawable account in the converting capital stock institution;

(2) The plan shall specify how and in what amount the return of capital to each class of stockholder in the form of an exchange of stock for savings accounts shall be effectuated;

(3) The plan shall provide for allocation of voting rights to the holders of savings accounts and the manner of exercise thereof; and

(4) The plan shall provide for evidence of insurance of deposits and other accounts of a withdrawable type by an agency of the federal government.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 25.